Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-216
Number of shareholders.

(MBCA 1.42) (a) For purposes of the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, the following identified as a shareholder in a corporation's current record of shareholders constitutes one shareholder:

(1) Three or fewer co-owners;

(2) A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, estate, or other entity; or

(3) The trustees, guardians, custodians, or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate, or account.

(b) For purposes of the act, shareholdings registered in substantially similar names constitute one shareholder if it is reasonable to believe that the names represent the same person.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 16;

Laws 2016, LB794, § 3.
January 1, 2017